Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1759.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Disposal of Waste Tires, Trash and Debris Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Disposal." The incineration, deposition, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking or placing of solid waste into or on the land or water in a manner that the solid waste or a constituent of the solid waste enters the environment, is emitted into the air or is discharged to the waters of this 12345678910111213141516 Commonwealth."Municipality." A city of the second class, a city of the second class A, a city of the third class, a borough, a township, an incorporated town or a home rule municipality."Short dumping." Activity by which an owner or operator, or an agent of the owner or operator, of a trash, garbage or debris collection vehicle, including private automobiles and small trucks or any other type of vehicle used to collect or transport trash, garbage or debris, knowingly causes to be deposited or deposits the vehicle's load, or any part of the load, on any road, street, highway, alley or railroad right-of-way, on the land of another or into the waters of this Commonwealth."Waste tire." A tire that has been discarded and can no longer be used for the purpose for which it was originally intended, regardless of whether the tire has any remaining useful life."Waste tire recycling facility." As defined in section 104 of the act of December 19, 1996 (P.L.1478, No.190), entitled "An act relating to the recycling and reuse of waste tires; providing for the proper disposal of waste tires and the cleanup of stockpiled tires; authorizing investment tax credits for utilizing waste tires; providing remediation grants for the cleanup of tire piles and for pollution prevention programs for small business and households; establishing the Small Business and Household Pollution Prevention Program and management standards for small business hazardous waste; providing for a household hazardous waste program and for grant programs; making appropriations; and making repeals."Section 3. Enforcement of trash laws.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any contrary provision of 20250HB1759PN2883 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act or the act of July 28, 1988 (P.L.556, No.101), known as the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act, a municipality may enforce ordinances, rules and regulations relating to:(1) short dumping by the imposition of a fine or penalty of not more than $5,000, and by the forfeiture of any property, including any vehicle, used to violate the act, regardless of the value of the property; and(2) disposal of waste tires by the imposition of a fine or penalty of not more than $500 per tire.(b) Suspension of operating privileges.--A municipality that imposes a fine or penalty against a person under subsection (a)(1) shall notify the Department of Transportation. On receipt of the notification, the Department of Transportation shall suspend the operating privileges of the person granted under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles) for a period of six months.(c) (B) Records to be retained by businesses that dispose of waste tires.--A business entity in a municipality that accepts used tires for disposal or recycling shall maintain a list of how many tires the business entity accepted and retain proof of disposal in the form of a receipt from an authorized waste tire recycling facility, as evidence of proper disposal of any tires accepted by the business entity. The business entity shall maintain all records for a minimum of five years and make the records available to the municipality at the municipality's request. The business entity shall retain the records electronically.(d) (C) Record review.--A municipality may review the records of a business entity that accepts waste tires for 20250HB1759PN2883 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disposal. The municipality may request that the business entity submit a copy of the business entity's records electronically or provide the municipality with a hard copy of the records as proof that the business entity complied with this act through the proper disposal of all waste tires received by the business entity.(e) (D) Appeal.--A business entity fined by a municipality under this section shall have the right to appeal a fine levied by the municipality to the court of common pleas.(f) (E) Use of fines and penalties.--A municipality that imposes a fine or penalty under subsection (a) shall use the money collected to:(1) encourage recycling;(2) expand waste tire disposal programs within a municipality in accordance with Chapter 1 of the act of December 19, 1996 (P.L.1478, No.190), known as the Waste Tire Recycling Act;(3) remediate the environmental impact of waste tires and other waste that has been improperly disposed of in the municipality;(4) prevent short dumping and the improper disposal of waste tires; and(5) enforce compliance with this act.(g) (F) Existing ordinance.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to invalidate or preempt an existing municipal ordinance or portion thereof as of the effective date of this subsection.(h) Forfeiture.--Forfeiture of any property carried out by a municipality under subsection (a)(1) shall be consistent with the provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 58 (relating to forfeiture of 20250HB1759PN2883 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assets).Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1759PN2883 - 5 - 123